Connecticut, session 2026, HB05226.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 7-148b of the 2026 supplement to the general
2 statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
3 (Effective October 1, 2026):
4 (a) For purposes of this section and sections 7-148c to 7-148f,
5 inclusive: [, "seasonal basis"]
6 (1) "Seasonal basis" means housing accommodations rented for a
7 period or periods aggregating not more than one hundred twenty days
8 in any one calendar year; [, "rental charge"]
9 (2) "Rental charge" includes any fee or charge in addition to rent that
10 is imposed or sought to be imposed upon a tenant by a landlord; [, and
11 "municipality"]
12 (3) "Municipality" means a town, city or consolidated town and city;
13 (4) "Mobile manufactured home" has the same meaning as provided
14 in section 21-64;
15 (5) "Mobile manufactured home park" has the same meaning as
LCO 1 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5226
16 provided in section 21-64;
17 (6) "Mobile manufactured home resident" means resident, as defined
18 in section 21-64; and
19 (7) "Mobile manufactured home space or lot" has the same meaning
20 as provided in section 21-64.
21 (b) (1) Any municipality may, and each municipality with a
22 population of fifteen thousand or more, as determined by the most
23 recent decennial census, shall, through its legislative body, adopt an
24 ordinance that [(1)] (A) creates a fair rent commission, [(2)] (B)
25 [establishes] creates, or joins [the] such municipality in, a joint fair rent
26 commission pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, or [(3)] (C) joins
27 [the] such municipality in a regional fair rent commission pursuant to
28 subsection (e) of this section. [Any such commission]
29 (2) Any municipality in which a mobile manufactured home park is
30 located shall, through its legislative body, adopt an ordinance that joins
31 such municipality in a regional fair rent commission pursuant to
32 subsection (e) of this section.
33 (3) Each commission created or joined pursuant to subdivision (1) or
34 (2) of this subsection shall make studies and investigations, conduct
35 hearings and receive complaints relative to rental charges on housing
36 accommodations, except those accommodations rented on a seasonal
37 basis, within its jurisdiction, which term shall include mobile
38 manufactured homes and mobile manufactured home [park] spaces or
39 lots, in order to control and eliminate excessive rental charges on such
40 accommodations, and to carry out the provisions of sections 7-148b to
41 7-148f, inclusive, as amended by this act, section 47a-20 and subsection
42 (b) of section 47a-23c. The commission, for such purposes, may compel
43 the attendance of persons at hearings, issue subpoenas and administer
44 oaths, issue orders and continue, review, amend, terminate or suspend
45 any of its orders and decisions. The commission may be empowered to
46 retain legal counsel to advise [it] the commission. All hearings
47 conducted pursuant to this section shall be open to the public.
LCO 2 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5226
48 (c) Any municipality required to create or join a fair rent commission
49 pursuant to subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (b) of this section shall
50 adopt an ordinance creating a fair rent commission, or joining a joint fair
51 rent commission or regional fair rent commission, on or before January
52 1, 2028. No municipality required to create or join a fair rent commission
53 pursuant to subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (b) of this section that
54 has created a fair rent commission prior to January 1, 2026, shall abolish
55 such commission before January 1, 2028, unless such municipality joins
56 a joint fair rent commission or regional fair rent commission pursuant
57 to this section. Not later than thirty days after the adoption of such
58 ordinance, the chief executive officer of such municipality shall (1)
59 notify the Commissioner of Housing that such commission has been
60 created or joined by such municipality, and (2) transmit a copy of the
61 ordinance adopted by the municipality to the commissioner.
62 (d) Two or more contiguous municipalities may, by concurrent
63 ordinances adopted by their legislative bodies, [establish] create a joint
64 fair rent commission. Any municipality that is contiguous to a
65 municipality that is a member of an existing joint fair rent commission
66 may become a member of such joint fair rent commission upon the
67 adoption of an ordinance by such municipality's legislative body. Any
68 municipality that is a member of a joint fair rent commission may, by
69 vote of its legislative body, elect to withdraw from such commission,
70 provided such withdrawing municipality creates its own fair rent
71 commission or joins another joint fair rent commission or regional fair
72 rent commission in compliance with the requirements of this section.
73 (e) (1) A regional council of governments formed pursuant to section
74 4-124j may establish a regional fair rent commission. Any municipality
75 that is a member of such council may join such regional fair rent
76 commission upon the adoption of an ordinance by such municipality's
77 legislative body. [Any]
78 (2) A regional council of governments formed pursuant to section 4-
79 124j shall establish a regional fair rent commission if a mobile
80 manufactured home park is located in any municipality that is a
LCO 3 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5226
81 member of such council. Each member municipality in which a mobile
82 manufactured home park is located shall join such regional fair rent
83 commission upon the adoption of an ordinance by such municipality's
84 legislative body.
85 (3) Each regional fair rent commission shall (A) prescribe a form and
86 manner in which complaints to such commission shall be made, and (B)
87 if a regional council of governments is required to establish such
88 commission pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection, (i) provide
89 members with training concerning (I) issues pertaining to mobile
90 manufactured homes and mobile manufactured home parks, and (II) the
91 laws governing mobile manufactured homes and mobile manufactured
92 home parks, (ii) include at least (I) one member who is a representative
93 of the Connecticut Manufactured Home Owners Alliance or its
94 successor, if said alliance or such successor exists, and (II) one member
95 who is a representative of the Connecticut Manufactured Housing
96 Association or its successor, if said association or such successor exists,
97 and (iii) allow the mobile manufactured home residents of a mobile
98 manufactured home park, upon the vote of a majority of such residents,
99 to remove such residents and such park from the jurisdiction of such
100 commission and subject such park and such residents to the jurisdiction
101 of a fair rent commission created by the municipality in which such park
102 is located, provided such municipality has created a fair rent
103 commission.
104 [(f)] (4) Upon the request of a party to a matter pending before a
105 regional fair rent commission, a meeting or a portion of a meeting
106 during which the participation of such party is required shall be
107 conducted by means of electronic equipment, as defined in section 1-
108 200, in conjunction with an in-person meeting of such commission.
109 [(g)] (5) Except as otherwise provided by law, a regional fair rent
110 commission shall not be liable for damages to person or property caused
111 by: (A) Acts or omissions of any employee, officer or agent which
112 constitute criminal conduct, fraud, actual malice or wilful misconduct;
113 or (B) negligent acts or omissions which require the exercise of judgment
LCO 4 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5226
114 or discretion as an official function of the authority expressly or
115 impliedly granted by law.
116 [(h)] (f) Any municipality that creates a fair rent commission pursuant
117 to this section shall make any bylaws adopted by such fair rent
118 commission publicly available on the Internet web site of such
119 municipality.
120 Sec. 2. Subsection (a) of section 21-70 of the general statutes is
121 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
122 1, 2026):
123 (a) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection shall adopt
124 regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, providing
125 for a disclosure statement which shall be used by mobile manufactured
126 home park owners. The disclosure statement shall be a plain language
127 summary of the rights and obligations listed in this chapter and shall
128 not add to or diminish the rights and obligations provided by this
129 chapter. Such disclosure statement shall include at least the following:
130 [information:] (1) The monthly rental fee and an enumeration of all
131 considerations payable by the resident to the owner, including, but not
132 limited to, all periodic fees, usage fees and penalty fees payable by the
133 resident to the owner; (2) the length of the rental term; (3) the amount of
134 land granted by the rental agreement; (4) an enumeration of goods and
135 services to be provided to the resident, including, but not limited to,
136 those goods and services to be provided free of charge; (5) notice if the
137 owner plans to terminate the operation of the park during the term of
138 the rental agreement; (6) a statement of conditions to be complied with
139 by the owner and resident in the event of the sale of the mobile
140 manufactured home by the resident, including, but not limited to,
141 aesthetic standards for resale, which conditions shall not be altered by
142 the owner after the rental agreement has been entered into; (7) the rights
143 of residents regarding eviction under section 21-80, as amended by this
144 act; (8) the rights of residents regarding the resale of a mobile
145 manufactured home under section 21-79; (9) the rights of residents in
146 the event that alterations of the rules concerning the resident's use and
LCO 5 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5226
147 occupancy of the premises under subsection (b) of this section are to be
148 made; (10) notice that outstanding property taxes may be owed on the
149 mobile manufactured home; and (11) notice that there may be liens and
150 other encumbrances on the mobile manufactured home and that the
151 resident or purchaser should check with the town clerk, tax assessor and
152 tax collector to determine whether any taxes are due on the mobile
153 manufactured home and within any liens or encumbrances on the
154 mobile manufactured home exist. Owners shall provide each
155 prospective resident, before any rental agreement is entered into, and
156 each resident, at the time of the first renewal of [his] such resident's
157 rental agreement which occurs after the effective date of the regulations
158 providing for a disclosure statement, with a completed disclosure
159 statement. No rental agreement entered into on or after the effective date
160 of the regulations providing for a disclosure statement shall be
161 enforceable until the requirements of this subsection are met. A copy of
162 such statement shall be signed by the resident at the time of the rental,
163 acknowledging receipt of a completed, signed copy and such
164 completed, signed copy shall be kept on file by the owner for a period
165 of four years after such resident vacates the park.
166 Sec. 3. Subsections (a) and (b) of section 21-70a of the general statutes
167 are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
168 October 1, 2026):
169 (a) A mobile manufactured home park resident who owns a mobile
170 manufactured home and is required to remove the home from the park
171 because of a change in use of the land on which said mobile
172 manufactured home is located shall be entitled to receive from the
173 mobile manufactured home park owner (1) relocation expenses to a
174 mobile manufactured home park satisfactory to the resident within one
175 hundred miles of the existing park site up to a maximum of (A) seven
176 thousand dollars if the notice given pursuant to subdivision (3) of
177 subsection (a) of section 21-80 or subparagraph (E) of subdivision (1) of
178 subsection (b) of section 21-80, as amended by this act, expires before
179 October 1, 2000, regardless of whether such notice was given before or
180 after June 23, 1999, [or] (B) subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of
LCO 6 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5226
181 this section, ten thousand dollars if the notice given pursuant to
182 subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of section 21-80 or subparagraph (E) of
183 subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of section 21-80, as amended by this act,
184 expires on or after October 1, 2000, but before October 1, 2026, regardless
185 of whether such notice was given before or after June 23, 1999, or (C)
186 twenty thousand dollars if the notice given pursuant to subdivision (3)
187 of subsection (a) of section 21-80 or subparagraph (E) of subdivision (1)
188 of subsection (b) of section 21-80, as amended by this act, expires on or
189 after October 1, 2026, regardless of whether such notice was given before
190 or after October 1, 2026, or (2) in the event a satisfactory site is not
191 available onto which the mobile manufactured home may be relocated,
192 the sum of (A) seven thousand dollars if the notice given pursuant to
193 subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of section 21-80 or subparagraph (E) of
194 subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of section 21-80, as amended by this act,
195 expires before October 1, 2000, regardless of whether such notice was
196 given before or after June 23, 1999, [or] (B) subject to the provisions of
197 subsection (b) of this section, ten thousand dollars if the notice given
198 pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of section 21-80 or
199 subparagraph (E) of subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of section 21-80, as
200 amended by this act, expires on or after October 1, 2000, but before
201 October 1, 2026, regardless of whether such notice was given before or
202 after June 23, 1999, or (C) twenty thousand dollars if the notice given
203 pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of section 21-80 or
204 subparagraph (E) of subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of section 21-80, as
205 amended by this act, expires on or after October 1, 2026, regardless of
206 whether such notice was given before or after October 1, 2026.
207 (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section,
208 in any case in which a mobile manufactured home park containing two
209 hundred or more units in which a majority of residents have been given
210 written notice, prior to June 23, 1999, pursuant to subdivision (3) of
211 subsection (a) of section 21-80 or subparagraph (E) of subdivision (1) of
212 subsection (b) of section 21-80, as amended by this act, regardless of
213 whether one or more of such notices or the service of such notices is
214 subsequently deemed invalid or ineffective, the amount of the
LCO 7 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5226
215 relocation or compensatory payments required to be paid to such
216 resident under the provisions of this section shall not exceed seven
217 thousand dollars, regardless of whether a subsequent valid notice or
218 notices are properly served subsequent to June 23, 1999, and such
219 subsequent notice or notices expire on or after October 1, 2000, but
220 before October 1, 2026.
221 Sec. 4. Section 21-71 of the general statutes is repealed and the
222 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
223 (a) The department may revoke, suspend, place conditions on or
224 refuse to renew any license to operate a mobile manufactured home
225 park for a violation of any provision of this chapter or any regulations
226 issued hereunder or any other state or local law or regulation, after
227 hearing, except that if the department upon investigation finds a
228 licensee is not providing adequate sewerage facilities, electrical,
229 plumbing or sanitary services, water supply or fire protection,
230 suspension of the license shall be automatic, provided such licensee
231 shall be entitled to a hearing before the department not later than thirty
232 days after such suspension. A license may be reinstated or reissued if
233 the circumstances leading to the violation have been remedied and the
234 park is being maintained and operated in full compliance with this
235 chapter and the regulations hereunder. Each officer, board, commission
236 or department of the state or any local government shall assist the
237 department with technical data on sewerage facilities, electrical,
238 plumbing or sanitary services, water supply or fire protection and shall
239 submit such data to the department for the department's use in any
240 hearing held pursuant to this section. In addition to revoking,
241 suspending, placing conditions on, or refusing to renew any license to
242 operate a mobile manufactured home park, the department may,
243 following an administrative hearing, impose a fine of not less than fifty
244 nor more than three hundred dollars for each day that such violation
245 exists. In connection with any investigation the Commissioner of
246 Consumer Protection or the commissioner's authorized agent may
247 administer oaths, issue subpoenas, compel testimony and order the
248 production of books, records and documents. Each owner shall retain
LCO 8 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5226
249 all leases, disclosure statements, rules and regulations required under
250 this chapter for at least four years after any resident to whom they relate
251 vacates the park.
252 (b) (1) If an inspection by the department reveals a violation of any
253 provision of this chapter or any regulation issued under this chapter, the
254 cost of all reinspections necessary to determine compliance with any
255 such provision shall be assumed by the owner, except that if a first
256 reinspection indicates compliance with such provision, no charge shall
257 be made.
258 (2) As part of an inspection or investigation, the department may
259 order an owner of a mobile manufactured home park to obtain an
260 independent inspection report, at the sole cost of the owner, that
261 assesses the condition and potential public health impact of a condition
262 at the park, including, but not limited to, the condition of trees and
263 electrical, plumbing or sanitary systems.
264 (3) (A) In ordering an owner of a mobile manufactured home park to
265 obtain an independent inspection report under this subsection, the
266 department may require (i) the person completing such report to have
267 training or be licensed in a particular area related to the ordered
268 inspection, and (ii) that such report specifically address particular areas
269 of, or issues affecting, the park that are of concern to the department.
270 (B) In the event that the department requires the person completing
271 an independent inspection report under this subsection to have training
272 or be licensed in a particular area, the department shall include such
273 requirement in the first order the department issues to the mobile
274 manufactured home park owner requiring such report.
275 (C) The mobile manufactured home park owner shall submit proof of
276 compliance with the provisions of this subdivision at the time the owner
277 submits to the department the independent inspection report required
278 under this subsection.
279 (4) If the department orders a mobile manufactured home park
LCO 9 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5226
280 owner to obtain an independent inspection report as part of the owner's
281 application for a license, or for renewal of a license, to operate a mobile
282 manufactured home park, the department shall issue such order to such
283 owner at the electronic mail address such owner most recently provided
284 to the department in such owner's application. Such order shall provide
285 a description of the condition or conditions that require further
286 assessment by such owner.
287 (5) A mobile manufactured home park owner shall obtain and submit
288 to the department an independent inspection report required under this
289 subsection not later than thirty days after the department issued the
290 order requiring such report or a later date approved, in writing, by the
291 commissioner or the commissioner's designee.
292 (6) Each independent inspection report required under this
293 subsection shall include (A) an assessment of (i) all conditions outlined
294 in the department's order requiring such report that impact public
295 health and safety for the purpose of assessing the risk that such
296 conditions pose to public health and safety, and (ii) the severity of the
297 conditions described in subparagraph (A)(i) of this subdivision, and (B)
298 a detailed plan of action to remedy each condition described in
299 subparagraph (A)(i) of this subdivision.
300 (7) Not later than ten days after a mobile manufactured home park
301 owner receives an independent inspection report required under this
302 subsection, the mobile manufactured home park owner shall provide to
303 the department, in writing, a detailed plan to remedy the assessed
304 condition, which plan shall include, at a minimum, a specific timeline,
305 proposed contractors and a budget.
306 (c) In addition to any other available remedies, the provisions of
307 section 47a-14h shall be available to all residents in a mobile
308 manufactured home park including residents who own their own units.
309 (d) The department may issue an order to any owner determined to
310 be in violation of any provision of this chapter or any regulation issued
311 under this section after an inspection of a mobile manufactured home
LCO 10 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5226
312 park, providing for the immediate discontinuance of the violation or
313 timely remediation of such violation. Any owner of a mobile
314 manufactured home park who fails to comply with any orders
315 contained in a notice of violation resulting from a reinspection of such
316 park not later than thirty days after issuance of such notice, including
317 confirmation of active licensure, shall be fined five hundred dollars per
318 violation and shall follow the procedures specified in section 51-164n.
319 (e) On and after January 1, 2027, when the department receives a
320 complaint submitted by a resident regarding a suspected violation of
321 any provision of this chapter, any regulation adopted pursuant to this
322 chapter or any other state or local law or regulation concerning mobile
323 manufactured home parks, the department shall promptly provide the
324 resident with an acknowledgment that the department has received
325 such complaint, which acknowledgment shall include, at a minimum,
326 (1) a summary, or a link to an Internet web site displaying a summary,
327 of the rights and responsibilities of residents, and (2) contact
328 information for the Connecticut Manufactured Home Owners Alliance
329 or its successor, if said alliance or such successor exists, including, but
330 not limited to, a link to said alliance's or such successor's Internet web
331 site.
332 Sec. 5. Subsection (b) of section 21-80 of the general statutes is
333 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
334 1, 2026):
335 (b) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 47a-23, an owner
336 may terminate a rental agreement or maintain a summary process action
337 against a resident who owns a mobile manufactured home only for one
338 or more of the following reasons:
339 (A) Nonpayment of rent, utility charges or reasonable incidental
340 services charges;
341 (B) Material noncompliance by the resident with any statute or
342 regulation materially affecting the health and safety of other residents
343 or materially affecting the physical condition of the park;
LCO 11 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5226
344 (C) Material noncompliance by the resident with the rental
345 agreement or with rules or regulations adopted under section 21-70, as
346 amended by this act;
347 (D) Failure by the resident to agree to a proposed rent increase,
348 provided the owner has complied with all provisions of subdivision (5)
349 of this subsection; or
350 (E) A change in the use of the land on which such mobile
351 manufactured home is located, provided all of the affected residents
352 receive written notice (i) at least three hundred sixty-five days before
353 the time specified in the notice for the resident to quit possession of the
354 mobile manufactured home or occupancy of the lot if such notice is
355 given before June 23, 1999, or (ii) at least five hundred forty-five days
356 before the time specified in the notice for the resident to quit possession
357 of the mobile manufactured home or occupancy of the lot if such notice
358 is given on or after June 23, 1999, regardless of whether any other notice
359 under this section or section 21-70, as amended by this act, has been
360 given before June 23, 1999; provided nothing in subsection (f) of section
361 21-70, section 21-70a, as amended by this act, subsection (a) of this
362 section, this subdivision and section 21-80b shall be construed to
363 invalidate the effectiveness of or require the reissuance of any valid
364 notice given before June 23, 1999.
365 (2) An owner may not maintain a summary process action under
366 subparagraph (B), (C) or (D) of subdivision (1) of this subsection, except
367 a summary process action based upon conduct which constitutes a
368 serious nuisance or a violation of subdivision (9) of subsection (b) of
369 section 21-82, prior to delivering a written notice to the resident
370 specifying the acts or omissions constituting the breach and that the
371 rental agreement shall terminate upon a date not less than thirty days
372 after receipt of the notice. If such breach can be remedied by repair by
373 the resident or payment of damages by the resident to the owner and
374 such breach is not so remedied within twenty-one days, the rental
375 agreement shall terminate except that (A) if the breach is remediable by
376 repairs or the payment of damages and the resident adequately
LCO 12 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5226
377 remedies the breach within said twenty-one-day period, the rental
378 agreement shall not terminate, or (B) if substantially the same act or
379 omission for which notice was given recurs within six months, the
380 owner may terminate the rental agreement in accordance with the
381 provisions of sections 47a-23 to 47a-23b, inclusive. For the purposes of
382 this subdivision, "serious nuisance" means (i) inflicting bodily harm
383 upon another resident or the owner or threatening to inflict such harm
384 with the present ability to effect the harm and under circumstances
385 which would lead a reasonable person to believe that such threat will be
386 carried out, (ii) substantial and wilful destruction of part of the
387 premises, (iii) conduct which presents an immediate and serious danger
388 to the safety of other residents or the owner, or (iv) using the premises
389 for prostitution or the illegal sale of drugs. If the owner elects to evict
390 based upon an allegation, pursuant to subdivision (8) of subsection (b)
391 of section 21-82, that the resident failed to require other persons on the
392 premises with the resident's consent to conduct themselves in a manner
393 that will not constitute a serious nuisance, and the resident claims to
394 have had no knowledge of such conduct, then, if the owner establishes
395 that the premises have been used for the illegal sale of drugs, the burden
396 shall be on the resident to show that the resident had no knowledge of
397 the creation of the serious nuisance.
398 (3) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 47a-23, termination of
399 any tenancy in a mobile manufactured home park shall be effective only
400 if made in the following manner:
401 (A) By the resident giving at least thirty days' notice to the owner;
402 (B) By the owner giving the resident at least sixty days' written notice,
403 which shall state the reason or reasons for such termination, except that,
404 when termination is based upon subparagraph (A) of subdivision (1) of
405 this subsection, the owner need give the resident only thirty days'
406 written notice, which notice shall state the total arrearage due, provided
407 [,] the owner shall not maintain or proceed with a summary process
408 action against a resident who tenders the total arrearage due to the
409 owner within such thirty days and who has not so tendered an arrearage
LCO 13 of 14

Substitute Bill No. 5226
410 under this subparagraph during the preceding twelve months.
411 (4) Except as otherwise specified, proceedings under this section shall
412 be as prescribed by chapter 832.
413 (5) Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit an owner from increasing
414 the rent at the termination of the rental agreement if (A) the owner
415 delivers a written notice of the proposed rent increase to the resident at
416 least [thirty] sixty days before the start of a new rental agreement; (B)
417 the proposed rent is consistent with rents for comparable lots in the
418 same park; and (C) the rent is not increased in order to defeat the
419 purpose of this subsection.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 7-148b
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 21-70(a)
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 21-70a(a) and (b)
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 21-71
Sec. 5 October 1, 2026 21-80(b)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(e)(2), "such municipality" was changed to "member
municipality in which a mobile manufactured home park is located" for
clarity; in Section 4(e), "Beginning on" was changed to "On and after" for
consistency with standard drafting conventions; and in Section 4(e)(2),
"such organization or successor" was changed to "said alliance or such
successor" and "such organization's or successor's" was changed to "said
alliance's or such successor's" for internal consistency.
GL Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 14 of 14